Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2318
Board; restriction on authority; cooperate with
University of Nebraska and other organizations.

The Nebraska Wheat Development,
Utilization, and Marketing Board shall not be authorized to set up research
or development units or agencies of its own, but shall limit its activity
to cooperation and contracts with the Department of Agriculture,
University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources, or
other proper local, state, or national organizations, public or private, in
carrying out the Nebraska
Wheat Resources Act.

Laws 1955, c. 5, § 18, p. 64;

Laws 1981, LB 11, § 35;

Laws 1987, LB 1, § 15;

Laws 2012, LB905, § 9.